Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-1644
Act; how construed.

(1) Nothing in the Community Health Worker Training Endorsement Act shall be construed to: (a) Create a licensure or certification requirement for a community health worker; (b) authorize a community health worker to perform tasks that require professional licensure; or (c) limit the scope of practice of a licensed health care professional.

(2) Completion of a recognized community health worker training program shall not constitute licensure, certification, or credentialing under the Uniform Credentialing Act.

Laws 2026, LB912, § 5.
July 18, 2026